Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-708
Insolvent bank; Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as receiver or liquidator; title to property.

Upon the acceptance of the appointment of receiver or liquidator aforesaid by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the possession of and title to all the assets, business and property of such banking institution of every kind and nature shall pass to and vest in said corporation and without the execution of any instruments of conveyance, assignment, transfer or endorsement.

Laws 1935, c. 8, § 8, p. 75;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-408;

R.S.1943, § 8-708.